Hawaii, session 2025, GM1134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OE THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. There are appropriated from the sources of
2 funding indicated below to collective bargaining statewide (BUF
3 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary
4 to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining
5 cost items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
6 representative of collective bargaining unit (5):
7 FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
8 General funds $7,779,584 $18,100,306
9 SECTION 2. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
10 allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
11 departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
12 the purposes of this part.
13 SECTION 3. Funds appropriated by this Act that are not
14 expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, of
15 the respective fiscal years, shall lapse as of those dates.
16 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3478 HB1031 CDl HMSO

H.B. NO. S';
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 12th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1031, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K; Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1031, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
75